Louisiana, session 2026, HB209.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:753.1 and 1217 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§753.1. Reporting of information to Louisiana Works for employer violation of
wage payments
A. Each city, parish, and district clerk of court shall maintain a docket of the
record of cases filed pursuant to R.S. 23:672.
B. The dockets required by Subsection A of this Section shall be submitted
monthly to Louisiana Works.
* * *
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-793 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 209
§1217. Reporting of information to Louisiana Works for employer violation of
wage payments
A. The clerk of the civil district court shall maintain a docket of the record
of cases filed pursuant to R.S. 23:672.
B. The dockets required by Subsection A of this Section shall be submitted
monthly to Louisiana Works
Section 2. Chapter 6-B of Title 23 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 23:671 through 677, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 6-B. MINIMUM WAGE
§671. Minimum wage; establishment
A. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the state
minimum wage is established and set as follows:
(1) Beginning January 1, 2027, the minimum wage shall be set at ten dollars
per hour. Every employer in the state shall pay to each employee wages at a rate of
not less than ten dollars per hour for hours worked in a pay period, regardless of how
the time at work is measured.
(2) Beginning January 1, 2029, the minimum wage shall be set at twelve
dollars per hour. Every employer in the state shall pay to each employee wages at
a rate of not less than twelve dollars per hour for hours worked in a pay period,
regardless of how the time at work is measured.
(3) Beginning January 1, 2031, the minimum wage shall be set at fourteen
dollars per hour. Every employer in the state shall pay to each employee wages at
a rate of not less than twelve dollars per hour for hours worked in a pay period,
regardless of how the time at work is measured.
B. If, at any time, the federal minimum hourly wage rate set by Section 6 of
the federal Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, or a successor federal law, is raised to
a rate higher than the state minimum wage rate, then the state minimum wage rate
shall be increased to the rate of the federal minimum wage rate.
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-793 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 209
§672. Civil Remedy
A. In addition to any other remedy provided by law, an employee shall have
a civil right of action for damages against an employer for a violation of the
provisions of R.S. 23:671.
B. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, such civil action
may be instituted in a parish, city, or district court of proper venue as follows:
(1) If the employer is a natural or juridical person, venue for the civil action
shall be proper if brought in the parish where the plaintiff is domiciled, or the parish
where the work or service subject to minimum wage was performed, or a parish of
proper venue pursuant to the general rules of venue as set forth in Code of Civil
Procedure Article 42.
(2) If the employer is the state, venue for the civil action shall be proper in
the Nineteenth Judicial District Court in East Baton Rouge Parish.
(3) If the employer is a public entity other than the state, venue shall be
proper in the parish of its domicile.
§673. Damages
Any employer who violates the provisions of R.S. 23:671 shall be liable to
the affected employee in the amount of the difference between the amount that the
employee was paid and the amount the employer was statutorily obligated to pay
pursuant to R.S. 23:671, plus reasonable attorney fees and court costs associated with
the civil action.
§674. Limitation of action
Any civil action filed to recover wages for a violation of this Chapter shall
commence within one year from the date that an employee becomes aware that the
employer is in violation of this Chapter.
§675. Notification of information
A.(1) The clerk for each court, including the civil district court for the parish
of Orleans, shall maintain a docket for the record of cases filed pursuant to the
provisions of this Chapter.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-793 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 209
(2) The dockets required in Subsection A of this Section shall be submitted
monthly to Louisiana Works.
B. On March first, and annually thereafter, Louisiana Works shall compile
a list of the names of the employers who have violated the provisions of this Chapter,
the number of employees affected thereby, and the dollar amount of each violation
and submit the list of such information to the House and Senate committees on labor
and industrial relations and the office of the governor.
§676. Exceptions
The provisions of this Chapter do not apply to the following:
(1) Student employees of private employers.
(2) Tipped employees and agricultural employees as defined by the federal
Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, or a successor federal law.
§677. Enforcement
Louisiana Works shall enforce this Chapter and may promulgate rules and
regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, R.S. 49:950 et
seq., necessary for the implementation of the provisions of this Chapter.
Section 3.(A) The monthly dockets required by the provisions of R.S. 13:753.1 and
1217 and R.S. 23:675 as enacted by Sections 1 and 2 of this Act shall be due beginning
February 1, 2027.
(B) The list required to be compiled and submitted by Louisiana Works as required
by the provisions of R.S. 23:675 as enacted by Section 2 of this Act shall be due beginning
March 1, 2028.
Section 4. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
this Act is vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act
shall become effective on the day following such approval.
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-793 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 209